Massachusetts, session 194th, S545.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The park managed by the department of conservation and recreation located in the South 
Boston section of the city of Boston between Farragut Road and Day Boulevard and East 
Broadway and Shore Road shall be formally known as Farragut Park named after Admiral David 
G. Farragut. The field at Farragut Park behind Evans Field running from Francis L. Murphy 
Memorial Rink to Shore Road shall be formally known as Rosher ~ McCathy Field named after 
Mr. Walter Rosher and Mr. Gerard McCarthy.